Missouri, session 2026, HB1821.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 208.036, to read as follows:
208.036. 1. Subject to any necessary waivers or approvals from the United
States Department of Agriculture, any person who pays a spenddown to become or
remain eligible for MO HealthNet benefits shall be automatically enrolled in the
supplemental nutrition assistance program. The department of social services shall
determine the procedures for automatic enrollment in the supplemental nutrition
assistance program.
2. The department of social services shall seek any necessary waivers or state
plan amendments from the United States Department of Agriculture requesting
approval for the automatic enrollment described in this section.
3. The department of social services may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1821 2
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔